Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.205

Stock purchase options—Incentive bonus contracts, stock purchase or bonus plans, and profit sharing plans.

Subject to any restrictions in its articles of incorporation and in accordance with and subject to the provisions of RCW 30A.08.088, the board of directors of a bank may grant options entitling the holders thereof to purchase from the corporation shares of any class of its stock. The instrument evidencing the option shall state the terms upon which, the time within which, and the price at which such shares may be purchased from the corporation upon the exercise of such option. If any such options are granted by contract, or are to be granted pursuant to a plan, to officers or employees of the bank, then the contract or the plan shall require the approval, within twelve months of its approval by the board of directors, of the holders of a majority of its voting capital stock. Subsequent amendments to any such contract or plan which do not change the price or duration of any option, the maximum number of shares which may be subject to options, or the class of employees eligible for options may be made by the board of directors without further shareholder approval.

Subject to any restrictions in its articles of incorporation, the board of directors of a bank shall have the authority to enter into any plans or contracts providing for compensation for its officers and employees, including, but not being limited to, incentive bonus contracts, stock purchase or bonus plans and profit sharing plans.

[ 2014 c 37 s 186; 1986 c 279 s 37. Formerly RCW 30.12.205.]